Wyoming, session 2026, SF0036.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-16-1301(a)(i), (ii) and by
creating new paragraphs (xxi) and (xxii), 21-16-1303(d),
21-16-1304(a)(i)(intro), (ii)(intro), (iii)(intro) and
(h)(intro), 21-16-1305(a)(i)(intro) and (e)(intro),
SF0036

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0094
21-16-1306 by creating a new subsection (c),
21-16-1307(b)(intro), (d)(intro) and (e)(intro),
21-16-1308(c)(ii), 21-16-1309(a) and by creating a new
subsection (c), 21-16-1312(c) and 21-18-404 are amended to
read:

21-16-1301. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Academic term" means the fall semester or
term, or the spring semester or term or other term offered
by an eligible institution. In this article, "term" and
"semester" have the same meaning; except that recipients
may elect to use the scholarship during summer school,
which except as provided by W.S. 21-16-1304(h) and
21-16-1305(e), counts toward the maximum number of terms
for which the student is eligible but does not count toward
computation of an academic year;

(ii) "Academic year" means two (2) consecutive
fall and spring semesters. or terms and is the period of
time a full-time student is expected to complete the
SF0036

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0094
equivalent of at least two (2) semesters of Unless
otherwise excluded under this article, academic work year
may also include summer term or other terms;

(xxi) "Remaining scholarship amount" means the
student's total scholarship amount less amounts previously
paid on behalf of the student from scholarships under W.S.
21-16-1304 or 21-16-1305;

(xxii) "Total scholarship amount" means the
dollar amount specified under W.S. 21-16-1304 or 21-16-1305
for the scholarship the student is first awarded under W.S.
21-16-1304 or 21-16-1305.

21-16-1303. Hathaway scholarship program; eligibility
requirements.

(d) No student shall be eligible for a scholarship
under this article for more than the equivalent of eight
(8) full-time semesters. Except as provided by subsection
(f) of this section, no student shall be eligible for a
scholarship under this article for any semesters commencing
after six (6) academic years following the student's
SF0036

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0094
initial eligibility. For purposes of this subsection, a
student's initial eligibility shall be deemed to commence
with the first semester in which the state is obligated to
reimburse an eligible institution for the student's
scholarship under this article. The department shall by
rule and regulation establish exceptions to this subsection
for military service, religious service and other good
cause shown.

21-16-1304. Hathaway opportunity, performance and
honor scholarships.

(a) Any student who meets the criteria under W.S.
21-16-1303 is eligible to receive a scholarship to pursue a
degree or certificate as follows:

(i) With a minimum cumulative high school GPA of
2.50 and a score equal to or greater than the 2015-2016
national percentile rank of forty-three (43) on a college
entrance examination administered throughout the United
States and relied upon by institutions of higher education
to determine acceptance of students for attendance, a
Hathaway opportunity scholarship for: in a total
SF0036

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0094
scholarship amount of six thousand seven hundred twenty
dollars ($6,720.00).

(ii) With a minimum cumulative high school GPA
of 3.0 and a score equal to or greater than the 2015-2016
national percentile rank of fifty-six (56) on a college
entrance examination administered throughout the United
States and relied upon by institutions of higher education
to determine acceptance of students for attendance, a
Hathaway performance scholarship for: in a total
scholarship amount of ten thousand eighty dollars
($10,080.00).

(iii) With a minimum cumulative high school GPA
of 3.5 and a score equal to or greater than the 2015-2016
national percentile rank of seventy-nine (79) on an
examination administered throughout the United States and
relied upon by institutions of higher education to
determine acceptance of students for attendance, a Hathaway
honor scholarship for: in a total scholarship amount of
thirteen thousand four hundred forty dollars ($13,440.00).

SF0036

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0094
(h) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (a)(i)(B), (ii)(B)
and (iii)(B) of this section, The applicable scholarship
amount awarded to any eligible student under this section
may be available to that student, upon election, for
enrollment in up to six (6) semester hours during any
summer academic term or other academic term offered by an
eligible institution outside of the regular fall or spring
semester., subject to the following:

21-16-1305. Hathaway provisional opportunity
scholarships.

(a) Any student who meets the criteria under W.S.
21-16-1303 is eligible to receive a Hathaway provisional
opportunity scholarship to pursue a certificate or degree
as follows:

(i) With a minimum cumulative high school GPA of
2.50 and either a score equal to or greater than the
2015-2016 national percentile rank of thirty (30) on a
college entrance examination administered throughout the
United States and relied upon by institutions of higher
education to determine acceptance of students for
SF0036

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0094
attendance or a qualifying cumulative score on a
career-technical aptitude test as determined by the
department, a scholarship for: in a total scholarship
amount of three thousand three hundred sixty dollars
($3,360.00).

(e) Notwithstanding subparagraph (a)(i)(B) of this
section, The scholarship amount awarded to any eligible
student under this section may be available to that
student, upon election, for enrollment in up to six (6)
semester hours during any summer academic term or other
academic term offered by an eligible institution outside of
the regular fall or spring semester., subject to the
following:

21-16-1306. Need based scholarships.

(c) Except as provided in this subsection, no student
shall be required by the eligible institution to elect to
use a greater portion of a scholarship awarded under W.S.
21-16-1304 or 21-16-1305 in order to decrease the student's
unmet financial need. For scholarships awarded under W.S.
SF0036

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0094
21-16-1304 and 21-16-1305 the calculation of unmet
financial need shall be in accordance with the following:

(i) For students receiving the Hathaway honors
scholarship, the scholarship amount used to calculate unmet
financial need shall be:

(A) One thousand six hundred eighty dollars
($1,680.00) per semester; or

(B) The amount provided under subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph times a fraction, the numerator of
which is the number of hours for which the student is
enrolled per semester and the denominator is twelve (12),
if the student enrolled at an eligible institution for at
least six (6) and less than twelve (12) semester hours.

(ii) For students receiving the Hathaway
performance scholarship, the scholarship amount used to
calculate unmet financial need shall be the lesser of:

(A) The scholarship amount actually used by
the student in the semester; or
SF0036

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0094

(B) One thousand two hundred sixty dollars
($1,260.00) per semester.

(iii) For students receiving the Hathaway
opportunity scholarship, the scholarship amount to
calculate unmet financial need shall be the lesser of:

(A) The scholarship amount actually used by
the student in the semester; or

(B) Eight hundred forty dollars ($840.00)
per semester.

(iv) For students receiving the Hathaway
provisional opportunity scholarship, the scholarship amount
used to calculate unmet financial need shall be the lesser
of:

(A) The scholarship amount actually used by
the student in the semester; or

SF0036

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0094
(B) Eight hundred forty dollars ($840.00)
per semester.

21-16-1307. Success curriculum; test standards.

(b) Except as otherwise provided for by law, the
success curriculum required to qualify for honor or
performance scholarship eligibility under this article for
students graduating from high school in the 2019-2020
school year and each school year thereafter shall be as
follows:

(d) The success curriculum required to qualify for
opportunity scholarship eligibility under this article for
students graduating from high school in the 2010-2011
school year and each school year thereafter shall be as
follows:

(e) The success curriculum required to qualify for
provisional opportunity scholarship eligibility under this
article for students graduating from high school in the
2010-2011 school year and each school year thereafter shall
SF0036

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0094
be the curriculum required for high school graduation under
W.S. 21-2-304(a)(iii) subject to the following:

21-16-1308. Administration; rules and regulations.

(c) The department shall establish annual reporting
procedures for purposes of policy analysis and program
evaluation and providing accurate data to the legislature
and governor relative to the program's impact on the state
and on students. In developing the annual reporting
procedure the department shall consult with the University
of Wyoming and community college financial aid officers and
registrars or their designees. It is the intention of the
legislature that the reporting system and the requirements
thereof shall be applicable to all recipients of
scholarships under this article. Compliance with this
section shall be made a condition of receiving a
scholarship under this article. For any student attending
more than one (1) eligible institution, the home
institution shall be responsible for data reporting for
that student, and any other eligible institution shall
cooperate as necessary with the home institution to fulfill
SF0036

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0094
that duty. The reporting system shall include the following
information:

(ii) Scholarships by students as they progress
from semester to semester or other equivalent periods of
time as may be applicable once enrolled at an eligible
institution. The data shall be reported by institution
attended, by the instructional program, and by scholarship
category and shall include the percent of students losing
scholarship eligibility due to not earning the minimum
number of credit hours, the percent of students losing
scholarship eligibility due to not having the required
cumulative grade point average, the percent of students
losing scholarship eligibility for failing to make
satisfactory academic progress and the percentage of
students losing scholarship eligibility for failing to
enroll. The same information shall also be reported by
categories showing those students qualifying through
career-technical aptitude assessment scores and scores on
high school equivalency certification, and by the group of
students who attended a home-based educational program and
did not graduate from an eligible high school;

SF0036

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0094
21-16-1309. Scholarship amounts.

(a) Except the needs based scholarship awarded
pursuant to W.S. 21-16-1306, to the extent a scholarship
under this article would, when combined with any grant or
scholarship from a student financial aid program
administered through the state or any state institution, in
any semester exceed the cost of attendance tuition and
mandatory fees at the eligible institution, the scholarship
under this article shall be reduced by the amount necessary
to not exceed that cost of attendance tuition and mandatory
fees.

(c) Any student receiving a scholarship under W.S
21-16-1304 or 21-16-1305 may elect to receive all or a
portion of the remaining scholarship amount in any semester
in which the student is enrolled at an eligible
institution. The election shall be submitted to the
eligible institution at the time of enrollment for an
academic term. The eligible institution shall calculate the
student's remaining scholarship amount in accordance with
W.S. 21-16-1301(a)(xxi) and shall include the amount, as
limited in this subsection, in its certification of
SF0036

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0094
students under W.S. 21-16-1308(a)(iv). The department shall
review the amount certified for each student and include
the amount it determines to be in compliance with this
article in its certification to the state treasurer of
balances due to each institution under W.S.
21-16-1308(a)(v). Crediting of a student's remaining
scholarship amount under this subsection shall be limited
so that the remaining scholarship amount to be credited
does not exceed the cost of the student's tuition and
mandatory fees for the semester.

21-16-1312. Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship;
eligibility requirements and conditions; selection.

(c) A Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship shall be
for the student's cost of attendance tuition and mandatory
fees at an eligible institution, but not to exceed the
maximum dollar amount provided to students receiving a
trustee scholarship at the University of Wyoming and
subject to reduction in accordance with W.S. 21-16-1309(a).
No student shall be eligible for a Hathaway expand Wyoming
scholarship for more than the equivalent of eight (8)
full-time semesters. Minimum continuing eligibility and
SF0036

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0094
reinstatement eligibility requirements for a Hathaway
expand Wyoming scholarship shall be the same as
requirements for a Hathaway honors scholarship. These
minimum requirements may be increased by rule of the
department to requirements no more stringent than those
imposed by the University of Wyoming for recipients of a
trustee scholarship. Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarships
may be reduced in the same manner and to lower levels as
provided for Hathaway honor scholarships for failure to
meet continuing eligibility requirements. To remain
eligible for the scholarship under this section, the
student shall:

(i) Maintain a cumulative GPA of 3.25;

(ii) Enroll in at least twelve (12) semester
hours for each spring and fall semester for the duration of
the scholarship;

(iii) Successfully complete at least twenty-four
(24) semester hours each academic year.

21-18-404. Student grants; amounts.
SF0036

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0094

There shall be made available student grants under the
Wyoming works program. The grant amount shall not exceed
the amount provided for two (2) semesters under the
Hathaway provisional opportunity scholarship pursuant to
W.S. 21-16-1305(a)(i)(A), one thousand six hundred eighty
dollars ($1,680.00) in any one (1) academic year, unless
the credential program is in an economic sector determined
by the commission to fulfill a critical workforce need.
For credential programs in such economic sectors, the grant
amount shall not exceed the amount provided for two (2)
semesters under the Hathaway honor scholarship pursuant to
W.S. 21-16-1304(a)(iii)(A) three thousand three hundred
sixty dollars ($3,360.00) in any one (1) academic year.
One-half (1/2) of the annual award shall be provided to the
student at each fall and spring academic term of
qualification, unless the credential program or course is
for a defined period of less than a full semester or the
student elects to reserve any portion of the annual award
for attendance at a subsequent summer school term. For
credential programs of one (1) term or less, cost of
attendance and unmet financial need shall be calculated on
a projected annual basis, but the annual award amount shall
SF0036

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0094
be provided in full in the term of attendance, on a
prorated basis.

Section 2. W.S. 21-16-1301(a)(xiv), 21-16-1303(f),
21‑16‑1304(a)(i)(A) through (C), (ii)(A) through (C),
(iii)(A) through (C), (b) through (g) and (h)(i) through
(v) and 21-16-1305(a)(i)(A) through (C), (ii), (iii), (b)
through (d) and (e)(i) through (v) are repealed.

Section 3. For any student who received a Hathaway
honors, performance, opportunity, provisional opportunity
or need based scholarship before the effective date of this
act and who continues to have eligibility for the
scholarship, the student shall continue to receive the
scholarship pursuant to title 21, chapter 16, article 13 of
the Wyoming Statutes as in effect on June 30, 2026.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0036